North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-29 Little Missouri State Scenic River Act

61-29-01.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Little Missouri State Scenic River Act.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 576, § 1.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota’s Historic Preservation Law, Robert E. Beck, 53 N.D. L. Rev. 177 (1976).

61-29-02.
Intent.

The purpose of this chapter shall be to preserve the Little Missouri River as nearly as possible in its present state, which shall mean that the river will be maintained in a free-flowing natural condition, and to establish a Little Missouri River commission.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 576, § 2.

61-29-03.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates:

“Free-flowing” shall mean existing or flowing in a natural condition without impoundment, diversion, straightening, or other modification of the waterway.

“Little Missouri River” means the river commencing at the North Dakota-South Dakota state border and terminating at its juncture with Lake Sakakawea, with such juncture defined as the bridge crossing of state highway twenty-two in section thirty-four, range ninety-five west, township one hundred forty-eight north, with boundaries established as the natural channels of the river to the low water mark.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 576, § 3.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

61-29-04.
Administration.

This chapter must be administered by a Little Missouri River commission composed of the director of the parks and recreation department, the director of the department of environmental quality, the director of the department of water resources, or their designated representatives, and one member from each of the following counties: McKenzie, Billings, Slope, Golden Valley, Dunn, and Bowman. The commission members representing the above-mentioned counties must be appointed by their respective boards of county commissioners and shall serve without compensation except that each appointing board of county commissioners may reimburse its county representative for actual and necessary mileage to and from meetings of the commission at the same rate as state officers. The county representatives appointed must be resident landowners who live adjacent to the Little Missouri River with the exception of the Golden Valley County representative. A county representative unable to attend a meeting of the commission may be represented by a person who has a written proxy from the representative authorizing that person to act and vote for the representative. The proxy must be a resident landowner of the county that the proxy is representing, but need not live adjacent to the Little Missouri River. The county members shall serve terms of office as follows: two members shall serve one-year terms, two members shall serve two-year terms, and two members shall serve three-year terms.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 576, § 4; 1989, ch. 760, § 1; 1991, ch. 640, § 38; 1993, ch. 80, § 37; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2017, ch. 199, § 71, effective April 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 179, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

State engineer serves as chief engineer of state water commission, see N.D.C.C. § 61-03-01.

61-29-05.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission may advise local or other units of government to afford the protection adequate to maintain the scenic, historic, and recreational qualities of the Little Missouri River and its tributary streams. The commission shall also have the power and duties of promulgating management policies to coordinate all activities within the confines of the Little Missouri River when such action is deemed necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 576, § 5.

61-29-06.
Management.

Channelization, reservoir construction, or diversion other than for agricultural, recreational, or temporary use purposes and the dredging of waters within the confines of the Little Missouri scenic river and all Little Missouri River tributary streams are expressly prohibited. Flood control dikes may be constructed within the floodplain of the Little Missouri River. Diking and riprapping for bank erosion control shall be permitted within the confines of the Little Missouri scenic river. The construction of impoundments for any purpose on the Little Missouri mainstream shall be prohibited.

This chapter shall in no way affect or diminish the rights of owners of the land bordering the river to use the waters for domestic purposes, including livestock watering, or any other rights of riparian landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 576, § 6; 2017, ch. 19, § 22, effective May 3, 2017.